Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2219.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1332(b)(5) and (c) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 1332 OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 1332. Display of registration plate.* * *(b) Obscuring plate.--It is unlawful to display on any vehicle a registration plate which:* * *(5) has a [tinted] plate cover.* * *(c) Penalty for obscured plate.--Any person who violates subsection (b)(2) or (4) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of [$100] $2,000.(c.1) Prohibition on similar citations.--A person may not be charged with a violation of section 3724 (relating to use of registration plate obscuring device) concurrently with a violation of subsection (b) for an offense committed at the same time and place.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 1340(A.1) OF TITLE 75 IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 1340. ANTIQUE, CLASSIC AND COLLECTIBLE PLATES.* * *(A.1) VINTAGE REGISTRATION PLATES.--IN LIEU OF A SPECIAL PLATE ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A), THE OWNER OF AN ANTIQUE OR CLASSIC MOTOR VEHICLE MAY REQUEST PERMISSION FROM THE DEPARTMENT TO DISPLAY A VINTAGE REGISTRATION PLATE FROM THE MODEL YEAR OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE. THE VINTAGE REGISTRATION PLATE SHALL BE:(1) PROVIDED BY THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER.(2) A PENNSYLVANIA REGISTRATION PLATE ISSUED BETWEEN THE YEARS 1906 AND [1976] 1999, OR A LATER YEAR AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(3) LEGIBLE FROM A REASONABLE DISTANCE.20260HB2219PN3612 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE APPLICANT SHALL PROVIDE INFORMATION AS THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE FOR PROCESSING THE REQUEST AND A $75 APPLICATION FEE. THE DEPARTMENT MAY DENY A REQUEST TO USE A VINTAGE REGISTRATION PLATE FOR CAUSE.* * *SECTION 3. SECTION 1341.1(B) OF TITLE 75 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:§ 1341.1. PERSONAL ORGANIZATION REGISTRATION PLATES.* * *(B) ADDITIONAL FEE.--* * *(3) FOR ANY PERSONAL PLATE ISSUED UNDER SECTION 1365 (RELATING TO GOLD STAR FAMILY PLATE), THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT COLLECT AN ADDITIONAL FEE.SECTION 4. TITLE 75 IS AMENDED BY ADDING SECTIONS TO READ:§ 1352.3. ARTS REGISTRATION PLATE.THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PENNSYLVANIA COUNCIL ON THE ARTS, SHALL DESIGN A SPECIAL ARTS REGISTRATION PLATE. UPON APPLICATION OF ANY PERSON, ACCOMPANIED BY A FEE OF $43, WHICH SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO THE ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE THE PLATE FOR A PASSENGER CAR, MOTOR HOME, TRAILER OR TRUCK WITH A REGISTERED GROSS WEIGHT OF NOT MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS. THE ARTS PROMOTION FUND ESTABLISHED IN SECTION 1905(E) (RELATING TO PAYMENTS TO SPECIAL FUNDS) SHALL RECEIVE $15 OF THE FEE PAID BY THE APPLICANT FOR THE PLATE.§ 1355.3. FISH PA PLATE.(A) DESIGN.--(1) NO LATER THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PENNSYLVANIA FISH AND BOAT COMMISSION, SHALL OFFER A PUBLIC 20260HB2219PN3612 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DESIGN CONTEST TO SCHOOL ENTITY AND NONPUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENTS IN KINDERGARTEN THROUGH FIFTH GRADE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH FOR A PERIOD OF 60 DAYS AFTER THE INITIAL OFFERING OF THE DESIGN CONTEST. THE PURPOSE OF THE DESIGN CONTEST SHALL BE TO SOLICIT ENTRIES FOR A SPECIAL FISH PA REGISTRATION PLATE.(2) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PENNSYLVANIA FISH AND BOAT COMMISSION, SHALL DESIGN A SPECIAL FISH PA REGISTRATION PLATE THAT:(I) IS BASED ON THE WINNING ENTRY IN THE DESIGN CONTEST UNDER PARAGRAPH (1);(II) INCLUDES THE PHRASE "FISH PA"; AND(III) FEATURES THE DEPICTION OF A BROOK TROUT.(B) APPLICATION.--UPON APPLICATION BY ANY PERSON AND PAYMENT OF A $43 FEE, WHICH SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO THE REGISTRATION FEE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A FISH PA REGISTRATION PLATE TO THE PERSON.(C) LIMITATION ON GROSS WEIGHT.--THE SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE MAY BE USED ONLY ON A PASSENGER CAR OR TRUCK WITH A REGISTERED GROSS WEIGHT OF NOT MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS.(D) FEE ALLOCATION TO FISH FUND.--(1) THE AMOUNT OF $14 OF EACH FEE COLLECTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE FISH FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER 30 PA.C.S. § 521 (RELATING TO ESTABLISHMENT AND USE OF FISH FUND).(2) THE MONEY DEPOSITED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL BE USED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA FISH AND BOAT COMMISSION FOR THE TROUT IN THE CLASSROOM PROGRAM OR A SUCCESSOR PROGRAM.§ 1358.3. MENTAL HEALTH REGISTRATION PLATE.(A) DESIGN.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGN A MENTAL HEALTH REGISTRATION PLATE. THE REGISTRATION PLATE SHALL FEATURE THE 20260HB2219PN3612 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LIBERTY BELL WITH A TEAL AND PURPLE RIBBON OVERLAY AND SHALL INCLUDE THE PHRASE "MENTAL HEALTH MATTERS" AT THE BOTTOM.(B) ISSUANCE.--UPON APPLICATION OF A PERSON, ACCOMPANIED BY A FEE OF $42, WHICH SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO THE REGISTRATION FEE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A MENTAL HEALTH REGISTRATION PLATE FOR A MOTORCYCLE, A PASSENGER CAR OR A TRUCK WITH A REGISTERED GROSS WEIGHT OF NOT MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS OR A MOTOR HOME.(C) FEES.--FIFTEEN DOLLARS OF EACH FEE RECEIVED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE MENTAL HEALTH RESTRICTED ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 1905(C.1) (RELATING TO PAYMENTS TO SPECIAL FUNDS).SECTION 5. SECTIONS 1364.1(B), 1365(A) AND 1368.2 OF TITLE 75 ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 1364.1. SPECIAL PLATES FOR CURRENT MEMBERS OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES.* * *(B) ELIGIBILITY.--A PLATE ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) SHALL BE FOR MEMBERS OF THE PENNSYLVANIA NATIONAL GUARD AND THE FOLLOWING BRANCHES OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES:(1) ARMY.(2) NAVY.(3) AIR FORCE.(4) MARINE CORPS.(5) COAST GUARD.(6) SPACE FORCE.* * *§ 1365. GOLD STAR FAMILY PLATE.(A) GENERAL RULE.--UPON APPLICATION OF A FAMILY MEMBER OF A PERSON WHO WAS KILLED WHILE SERVING ON ACTIVE DUTY IN THE 20260HB2219PN3612 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MILITARY, ACCOMPANIED BY [A FEE OF $20 WHICH SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO THE ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE AND BY] SUCH DOCUMENTATION AS THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO THE FAMILY MEMBER A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE DESIGNATING THE VEHICLE SO LICENSED AS BELONGING TO A FAMILY MEMBER OF A PERSON WHO WAS KILLED WHILE SERVING ON ACTIVE DUTY IN THE MILITARY. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGN AND PRODUCE THE SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE CARRYING THE SERVICE FLAG GOLD STAR RIMMED WITH BLUE WHICH REPRESENTS SACRIFICE TO THE CAUSE OF LIBERTY AND FREEDOM. THE WORDS "GOLD STAR FAMILY" SHALL BE CLEARLY DISPLAYED ALONG THE BOTTOM OF THE PLATE. THE SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE MAY BE USED ONLY ON A PASSENGER CAR OR TRUCK WITH A REGISTERED GROSS WEIGHT OF NOT MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS.* * *§ 1368.2. SPECIAL PLATES FOR RECIPIENTS OF PRESIDENTIAL SERVICE BADGE.UPON APPLICATION OF ANY PERSON WHO IS A RECIPIENT OF THE PRESIDENTIAL SERVICE BADGE, ACCOMPANIED BY A FEE OF [$20] $28 WHICH SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO THE REGISTRATION FEE AND BY SUCH DOCUMENTATION AS THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO THE PERSON A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE DESIGNATING THE VEHICLE SO LICENSED AS BELONGING TO A PERSON WHO IS A RECIPIENT OF THE PRESIDENTIAL SERVICE BADGE. THE SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE MAY BE USED ONLY ON A PASSENGER CAR OR TRUCK WITH A REGISTERED GROSS WEIGHT OF NOT MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS.SECTION 6. TITLE 75 IS AMENDED BY ADDING SECTIONS TO READ:§ 1368.5. SPECIAL PLATES FOR RECIPIENTS OF VICE PRESIDENTIAL SERVICE BADGE.UPON APPLICATION OF ANY PERSON WHO IS A RECIPIENT OF THE VICE PRESIDENTIAL SERVICE BADGE, ACCOMPANIED BY A FEE OF $28 WHICH 20260HB2219PN3612 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO THE REGISTRATION FEE AND BY SUCH DOCUMENTATION AS THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO THE PERSON A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE DESIGNATING THE VEHICLE SO LICENSED AS BELONGING TO A PERSON WHO IS A RECIPIENT OF THE VICE PRESIDENTIAL SERVICE BADGE. THE SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE MAY BE USED ONLY ON A PASSENGER CAR OR TRUCK WITH A REGISTERED GROSS WEIGHT OF NOT MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS.§ 1369.5. SPECIAL PLATES FOR RECIPIENTS OF COMMENDATION MEDALS.(A) ISSUANCE.--UPON APPLICATION OF A PERSON WHO IS A RECIPIENT OF THE JOINT SERVICE COMMENDATION MEDAL, ARMY COMMENDATION MEDAL, NAVY AND MARINE CORPS COMMENDATION MEDAL, AIR AND SPACE COMMENDATION MEDAL OR COAST GUARD COMMENDATION MEDAL, ACCOMPANIED BY A FEE OF $28 WHICH SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO THE REGISTRATION FEE AND ANY DOCUMENTATION THE DEPARTMENT REQUIRES, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO THE PERSON A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE DESIGNATING THE VEHICLE SO LICENSED AS BELONGING TO A PERSON WHO IS A RECIPIENT OF THE JOINT SERVICE COMMENDATION MEDAL, ARMY COMMENDATION MEDAL, NAVY AND MARINE CORPS COMMENDATION MEDAL, AIR AND SPACE COMMENDATION MEDAL OR COAST GUARD COMMENDATION MEDAL.(B) LIMITATION.--A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE USED ONLY ON A PASSENGER CAR OR TRUCK WITH A REGISTERED GROSS WEIGHT OF NOT MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS.(C) DESIGN.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGN AND PRODUCE THE SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE UNDER THIS SECTION TO DISPLAY THE JOINT SERVICE COMMENDATION MEDAL, ARMY COMMENDATION MEDAL, NAVY AND MARINE CORPS COMMENDATION MEDAL, AIR AND SPACE COMMENDATION MEDAL OR COAST GUARD COMMENDATION MEDAL AND THE WORDS "JOINT SERVICE COMMENDATION MEDAL," "ARMY COMMENDATION MEDAL," "NAVY 20260HB2219PN3612 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND MARINE CORPS COMMENDATION MEDAL," "AIR AND SPACE COMMENDATION MEDAL" OR "COAST GUARD COMMENDATION MEDAL" AT THE BOTTOM OF EACH PLATE.§ 1369.6. SPECIAL PLATES FOR RECIPIENTS OF ACHIEVEMENT MEDALS.(A) ISSUANCE.--UPON APPLICATION OF A PERSON WHO IS A RECIPIENT OF THE JOINT SERVICE ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, ARMY ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, NAVY AND MARINE CORPS ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, AIR AND SPACE ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL OR COAST GUARD ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, ACCOMPANIED BY A FEE OF $28 WHICH SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO THE REGISTRATION FEE AND ANY DOCUMENTATION THE DEPARTMENT REQUIRES, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE TO THE PERSON A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE DESIGNATING THE VEHICLE SO LICENSED AS BELONGING TO A PERSON WHO IS A RECIPIENT OF THE JOINT SERVICE ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, ARMY ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, NAVY AND MARINE CORPS ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, AIR AND SPACE ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL OR COAST GUARD ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL.(B) LIMITATION.--A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE USED ONLY ON A PASSENGER CAR OR TRUCK WITH A REGISTERED GROSS WEIGHT OF NOT MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS.(C) DESIGN.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGN AND PRODUCE THE SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE UNDER THIS SECTION TO DISPLAY THE JOINT SERVICE ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, ARMY ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, NAVY AND MARINE CORPS ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL, AIR AND SPACE ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL OR COAST GUARD ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL AND THE WORDS "JOINT SERVICE ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL," "ARMY ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL," "NAVY AND MARINE CORPS ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL," "AIR AND SPACE ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL" OR "COAST GUARD ACHIEVEMENT MEDAL" AT THE BOTTOM OF EACH PLATE.SECTION 7. SECTION 1905 OF TITLE 75 IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:20260HB2219PN3612 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1905. PAYMENTS TO SPECIAL FUNDS.* * *(C.1) MENTAL HEALTH RESTRICTED ACCOUNT.--THE MENTAL HEALTH RESTRICTED ACCOUNT IS ESTABLISHED IN THE STATE TREASURY FOR THE PURPOSE OF OPERATIONS OF THE 988 SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE OR ITS SUCCESSOR. THE MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT IS APPROPRIATED ON A CONTINUING BASIS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION.* * *(E) ARTS PROMOTION FUND.-- (1) THE ARTS PROMOTION FUND IS ESTABLISHED WITHIN THE STATE TREASURY FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING GRANTS FOR THE ARTS.(2) FIFTEEN DOLLARS OF EACH FEE RECEIVED UNDER SECTION 1352.3 (RELATING TO ARTS REGISTRATION PLATE) SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE ARTS PROMOTION FUND.(3) ALL MONEY IN THE ARTS PROMOTION FUND IS APPROPRIATED ON A CONTINUING BASIS TO THE PENNSYLVANIA COUNCIL ON THE ARTS AND MAY BE EXPENDED, SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5), FOR THE PURPOSES AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(4) ESTIMATES OF AMOUNTS TO BE EXPENDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE GOVERNOR BY THE PENNSYLVANIA COUNCIL ON THE ARTS FOR APPROVAL.(5) THE STATE TREASURER MAY NOT HONOR ANY REQUISITION FOR EXPENDITURES BY THE PENNSYLVANIA COUNCIL ON THE ARTS IN EXCESS OF ESTIMATES APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR OR IN EXCESS OF THE AMOUNT AVAILABLE FOR THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH THE REQUISITION WAS MADE, WHICHEVER IS THE LESSER AMOUNT.Section 2 8. Section 3724 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 3724. Use of registration plate [flipping] obscuring device.20260HB2219PN3612 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Prohibition.--A person may not [possess,] operate a motor vehicle with[, purchase, install, possess for the purpose of installing, manufacture, sell, offer to sell or otherwise distribute] a registration plate [flipping] obscuring device.(b) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, pay a fine of $2,000.(b.1) Prohibition on similar citations.--A person may not be charged with a violation of section 1332(b) (relating to display of registration plate) concurrently with a violation of this section for an offense committed at the same time and place.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:["Registration plate flipping device." A manual, electric or mechanical device designed or adapted to be installed on a motor vehicle and:(1) switch between two or more registration plates for the purpose of allowing a motor vehicle operator to change the registration plate displayed on the operator's motor vehicle; or(2) hide a registration plate from view by flipping the registration plate so that the registration plate number is not visible.]"Registration plate obscuring device." As follows:(1) A device or product that enables a registration plate on a motor vehicle to be intentionally obscured either manually or electronically.(2) The term includes technology that:(i) is capable of hiding a registration plate from 20260HB2219PN3612 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 view;(ii) is capable of changing the appearance of a registration plate to appear as a different registration plate; or(iii) does not change the appearance of a registration plate but is capable of inhibiting the proper operation of:(A) an automated red light enforcement system in place in accordance with section 3116 (relating to automated red light enforcement systems in first class cities) or 3117 (relating to automated red light enforcement systems in certain municipalities);(B) another automated enforcement system authorized by this title; or(C) an electronic toll collection system authorized under 74 Pa.C.S. § 8117 (relating to electronic toll collection).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 9. SECTION 6109 OF TITLE 75 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 6109. SPECIFIC POWERS OF DEPARTMENT AND LOCAL AUTHORITIES.* * *(K) INDEMNIFICATION OF ELECTED OFFICIALS NOT REQUIRED.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT DENY A PERMIT FOR A PROCESSION, SPECIAL ACTIVITY OR ASSEMBLAGE ON A STATE-DESIGNATED HIGHWAY UNDER SUBSECTION (J) IF THE SPONSOR MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (J) BUT DOES NOT INDEMNIFY ELECTED OFFICIALS PARTICIPATING IN THE PROCESSION, SPECIAL ACTIVITY OR ASSEMBLAGE.SECTION 10. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE AMENDMENT OF 75 PA.C.S. § 1340(A.1) SHALL TAKE 20260HB2219PN3612 - 11 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EFFECT NOVEMBER 1, 2026.(2) THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF 75 PA.C.S. §§ 1352.3, 1355.3, 1358.3, 1364.1(B), 1368.2, 1368.5, 1369.5, 1369.6 AND 1905(C.1) AND (E) SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 120 DAYS.(3) THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(4) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20260HB2219PN3612 - 12 - 1234567